Utah statutes.
19-5-105.   Rulemaking authority and procedure.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), no rule that the board makes for the purpose of the state administering a program under the federal Clean Water Act or the federal Safe Drinking Water Act may be more stringent than the corresponding federal regulations which address the same circumstances.  In making rules, the board may incorporate by reference corresponding federal regulations.

(2)  The board may make rules more stringent than corresponding federal regulations for the purpose described in Subsection (1), only if it makes a written finding after public comment and hearing and based on evidence in the record that the corresponding federal regulations are not adequate to protect public health and the environment of the state.  Those findings shall be accompanied by an opinion referring to and evaluating the public health and environmental information and studies contained in the record which form the basis for the board's conclusion.

(3)  The board may make rules related to agriculture water more stringent than the corresponding federal regulations if the commission approves.



Amended by Chapter 155, 2011 General Session

